District of Columbia statutes.
9-809

Agreements for municipal services.

The Administrator may enter into agreements with the state, or any political subdivision thereof, in which the airport or any portion thereof is situated, for such state or municipal services as the Administrator shall deem necessary to the proper and efficient operation and protection of the airport, and he may, from time to time, agree to modifications in any such agreement; provided, however, that where the charge for any such service is established by the laws of the state, the Administrator may not pay for such service in excess of the charge so established.

History

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 772, ch. 905, § 9
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1209.
1973 Ed., § 7-1409.